Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.222

Rural, island, and intercounty rural districts—General obligation bonds—Excess levies.

A rural county library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library district may contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-tenth of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. The maximum term of nonvoter approved general obligation bonds shall not exceed twenty years. A rural county library district, island library district, or intercounty rural library district may additionally contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one-half of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015 whenever a proposition authorizing the issuance of such bonds has been approved by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, by three-fifths of the persons voting on the proposition at which election the number of persons voting on the proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general election. If the voters shall so authorize at an election held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, the district may levy annual taxes in excess of normal legal limitations to pay the principal and interest upon such bonds as they shall become due. The excess levies mentioned in this section or in RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.056 may be made notwithstanding anything contained in RCW 27.12.050 or 27.12.150 or any other statute pertaining to such library districts.

[ 2020 c 207 s 1; 1984 c 186 s 8; 1982 c 123 s 11; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 3; 1955 c 59 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.

Island library districts—Tax levies: RCW 27.12.420.